Illinois, session 104th, HB1583.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5changing Section 10.2 and by adding Section 10.27 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 705/10.2)7    Sec. 10.2. Criminal background investigations. 8    (a) On and after March 14, 2002 (the effective date of 9Public Act 92-533), an applicant for employment as a peace 10officer or school safety officer, or for annual certification 11as a retired law enforcement officer qualified under federal 12law to carry a concealed weapon, shall authorize an 13investigation to determine if the applicant has been convicted 14of any criminal offense that disqualifies the person as a 15peace officer or school safety officer.16    (b) No law enforcement agency may knowingly employ a 17person, or certify a retired law enforcement officer qualified 18under federal law to carry a concealed weapon, unless (i) a 19criminal background investigation of that person has been 20completed and (ii) that investigation reveals no convictions 21of or pleas of guilty to offenses specified in subsection (a) 22of Section 6.1 of this Act.23(Source: P.A. 101-187, eff. 1-1-20; 101-652, eff. 1-1-22;   HB1583- 2 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 2    (50 ILCS 705/10.27 new)3    Sec. 10.27. School safety officers.4    (a) The Board shall develop a course for school safety 5officers, as defined in Section 10-20.88 of the School Code.6    (b) The school safety officer course shall be developed 7within one year after the effective date of this amendatory 8Act of the 104th General Assembly and shall be created in 9consultation with organizations demonstrating expertise and 10experience in the areas of youth and adolescent developmental 11issues, educational administrative issues, prevention of child 12abuse and exploitation, youth mental health treatment, and 13juvenile advocacy.14    Training shall include de-escalation, use of force, mental 15health awareness and response, officer wellness, reporting 16child abuse and neglect, and cultural competency.17    (c) The Board shall develop a process allowing school 18boards to request a waiver of this training requirement for an 19individual who would be assigned as a school safety officer. 20Applications for these waivers may be submitted by a school 21board for any officer whose prior training and experience may 22qualify for a waiver of the training requirement of this 23subsection. The Board may issue a waiver at its discretion, 24based solely on the prior training and experience of an 25officer.  HB1583- 3 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    (d) Upon completion, the school board shall be issued a 2certificate attesting to a specific officer's completion of 3the school safety officer training. Additionally, a letter of 4approval shall be issued to the school board for any officer 5who is approved for a training waiver under this Section. 6    (e) The Board may adopt rules to implement this Section.  7    Section 10. The Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body Camera 8Act is amended by changing Section 10-15 as follows: 9    (50 ILCS 706/10-15)10    Sec. 10-15. Applicability. 11    (a) All law enforcement agencies must employ the use of 12officer-worn body cameras in accordance with the provisions of 13this Act, whether or not the agency receives or has received 14monies from the Law Enforcement Camera Grant Fund. 15    (b) Except as provided in subsection (b-5), all law 16enforcement agencies must implement the use of body cameras 17for all law enforcement officers, according to the following 18schedule:19        (1) for municipalities and counties with populations 20    of 500,000 or more, body cameras shall be implemented by 21    January 1, 2022;22        (2) for municipalities and counties with populations 23    of 100,000 or more but under 500,000, body cameras shall 24    be implemented by January 1, 2023;  HB1583- 4 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1        (3) for municipalities and counties with populations 2    of 50,000 or more but under 100,000, body cameras shall be 3    implemented by January 1, 2024;4        (4) for municipalities and counties under 50,000, body 5    cameras shall be implemented by January 1, 2025; and6        (5) for all State agencies with law enforcement 7    officers and other remaining law enforcement agencies, 8    body cameras shall be implemented by January 1, 2025. 9    (b-5) If a law enforcement agency that serves a 10municipality with a population of at least 100,000 but not 11more than 500,000 or a law enforcement agency that serves a 12county with a population of at least 100,000 but not more than 13500,000 has ordered by October 1, 2022 or purchased by that 14date officer-worn body cameras for use by the law enforcement 15agency, then the law enforcement agency may implement the use 16of body cameras for all of its law enforcement officers by no 17later than July 1, 2023. Records of purchase within this 18timeline shall be submitted to the Illinois Law Enforcement 19Training Standards Board by January 1, 2023. 20    (c) A law enforcement agency's compliance with the 21requirements under this Section shall receive preference by 22the Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board in 23awarding grant funding under the Law Enforcement Camera Grant 24Act. 25    (d) This Section does not apply to court security 26officers, State's Attorney investigators, and Attorney General   HB1583- 5 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1investigators. This Section does not apply to a school safety 2officer if a school board does not require the officer to wear 3an officer-worn body camera. 4(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 7-1-21; 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 5102-1104, eff. 12-6-22.) 6    Section 15. The School Code is amended by changing 7Sections 10-20.64, 10-22.6, 17-2.11, 22-85, 22-88, 26A-20, 827-23.7, and 34-18.57 and by adding Section 10-20.88 as 9follows: 10    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.64)11    Sec. 10-20.64. Booking stations on school grounds.12    (a) There shall be no student booking station established 13or maintained on the grounds of any school.14    (b) This prohibition shall be applied to student booking 15stations only, as defined in this Section. The prohibition 16does not prohibit or affect the establishment or maintenance 17of any place operated by or under the control of law 18enforcement personnel, school resource officers, school safety 19officers, or other security personnel that does not also 20qualify as a student booking station as defined in paragraph 21(2) of subsection (d) of this Section. The prohibition does 22not affect or limit the powers afforded law enforcement 23officers to perform their duties within schools as otherwise 24prescribed by law.  HB1583- 6 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    (c) When the underlying suspected or alleged criminal act 2is an act of violence, and isolation of a student or students 3is deemed necessary to the interest of public safety, and no 4other location is adequate for secure isolation of the student 5or students, offices as described in paragraph (1) of 6subsection (d) of this Section may be employed to detain 7students for a period no longer than that required to 8alleviate that threat to public safety.9    (d) As used in this Section, "student booking station" 10means a building, office, room, or any indefinitely 11established space or site, mobile or fixed, which operates 12concurrently as:13        (1) predominantly or regularly a place of operation 14    for a municipal police department, county sheriff 15    department, or other law enforcement agency, or under the 16    primary control thereof; and17        (2) a site at which students are detained in 18    connection with criminal charges or allegations against 19    those students, taken into custody, or engaged with law 20    enforcement personnel in any process that creates a law 21    enforcement record of that contact with law enforcement 22    personnel or processes.23(Source: P.A. 100-204, eff. 8-18-17; 100-863, eff. 8-14-18.) 24    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)25    Sec. 10-20.88. School safety officers.  HB1583- 7 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    (a) In this Section, "school safety officer" means a 2retired law enforcement officer who has been hired by a school 3district to perform security services.4    (b) Beginning January 1, 2026, a school district may 5employ a school safety officer with jurisdiction only on 6school grounds. Prior to beginning employment, the school 7safety officer must provide the school district a certificate 8of completion or approved waiver issued by the Illinois Law 9Enforcement Training Standards Board under Section 10.27 of 10the Illinois Police Training Act.11    (c) A school safety officer shall wear a uniform that 12clearly identifies the officer as a school safety officer. A 13school district may issue a badge for school safety officers, 14but the badge must clearly state that the individual is a 15school safety officer and indicate the school to which the 16officer is assigned.17    (d) A school safety officer may detain a person when the 18officer has reasonable suspicion to believe that an offense, 19other than an ordinance violation, is being committed and 20until an arrest by a law enforcement agency or administrative 21action by the school.22    (e) A school safety officer may carry a firearm as long as 23the officer has successfully completed a course under Section 242 of the Peace Officer and Probation Officer Firearm Training 25Act and the annual range qualification under Section 2.5 of 26the Peace Officer and Probation Officer Firearm Training Act.   HB1583- 8 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    (f) A school board may require a school safety officer to 2wear an officer-worn body camera when on duty.  3    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.6)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-22.6)4    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 102-466)5    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 6searches. 7    (a) To expel students guilty of gross disobedience or 8misconduct, including gross disobedience or misconduct 9perpetuated by electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) 10of this Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 11expulsion. Expulsion shall take place only after the parents 12have been requested to appear at a meeting of the board, or 13with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss their 14child's behavior. Such request shall be made by registered or 15certified mail and shall state the time, place and purpose of 16the meeting. The board, or a hearing officer appointed by it, 17at such meeting shall state the reasons for dismissal and the 18date on which the expulsion is to become effective. If a 19hearing officer is appointed by the board, the hearing officer 20shall report to the board a written summary of the evidence 21heard at the meeting and the board may take such action thereon 22as it finds appropriate. If the board acts to expel a student, 23the written expulsion decision shall detail the specific 24reasons why removing the student from the learning environment 25is in the best interest of the school. The expulsion decision   HB1583- 9 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1shall also include a rationale as to the specific duration of 2the expulsion. An expelled student may be immediately 3transferred to an alternative program in the manner provided 4in Article 13A or 13B of this Code. A student must not be 5denied transfer because of the expulsion, except in cases in 6which such transfer is deemed to cause a threat to the safety 7of students or staff in the alternative program. 8    (b) To suspend or by policy to authorize the 9superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 10principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend 11students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, or to 12suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct on 13the school bus from riding the school bus, pursuant to 14subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this Section, and no action 15shall lie against them for such suspension. The board may by 16policy authorize the superintendent of the district or the 17principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 18school to suspend students guilty of such acts for a period not 19to exceed 10 school days. If a student is suspended due to 20gross disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board 21may suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety 22reasons. 23    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 24parents or guardian of a student along with a full statement of 25the reasons for such suspension and a notice of their right to 26a review. The school board must be given a summary of the   HB1583- 10 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 2suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardian, 3the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall 4review such action of the superintendent or principal, 5assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 6parents or guardian of the student may appear and discuss the 7suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing 8officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 9a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After 10its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 11hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds 12appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 13subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 14decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or 15misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 16suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the 17specific duration of the suspension.18    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 19and consequences available to school officials, school 20exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, 21are the most serious. School officials shall limit the number 22and duration of expulsions and suspensions to the greatest 23extent practicable, and it is recommended that they use them 24only for legitimate educational purposes. To ensure that 25students are not excluded from school unnecessarily, it is 26recommended that school officials consider forms of   HB1583- 11 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1non-exclusionary discipline prior to using out-of-school 2suspensions or expulsions. 3    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this 4Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies 5by which school administrators are required to suspend or 6expel students for particular behaviors.7    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be 8used only if the student's continuing presence in school would 9pose a threat to school safety or a disruption to other 10students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 11subsection (b-15), "threat to school safety or a disruption to 12other students' learning opportunities" shall be determined on 13a case-by-case basis by the school board or its designee. 14School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve 15such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 16length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.17    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 18out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions, 19and disciplinary removals to alternative schools may be used 20only if other appropriate and available behavioral and 21disciplinary interventions have been exhausted and the 22student's continuing presence in school would either (i) pose 23a threat to the safety of other students, staff, or members of 24the school community or (ii) substantially disrupt, impede, or 25interfere with the operation of the school. For purposes of 26this subsection (b-20), "threat to the safety of other   HB1583- 12 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1students, staff, or members of the school community" and 2"substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the 3operation of the school" shall be determined on a case-by-case 4basis by school officials. For purposes of this subsection 5(b-20), the determination of whether "appropriate and 6available behavioral and disciplinary interventions have been 7exhausted" shall be made by school officials. School officials 8shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve such threats, 9address such disruptions, and minimize the length of student 10exclusions to the greatest extent practicable. Within the 11suspension decision described in subsection (b) of this 12Section or the expulsion decision described in subsection (a) 13of this Section, it shall be documented whether other 14interventions were attempted or whether it was determined that 15there were no other appropriate and available interventions.16    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 17than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 18support services during the period of their suspension. For 19purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 20support services" shall be determined by school authorities. 21Within the suspension decision described in subsection (b) of 22this Section, it shall be documented whether such services are 23to be provided or whether it was determined that there are no 24such appropriate and available services. 25    A school district may refer students who are expelled to 26appropriate and available support services.  HB1583- 13 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 2re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school, 3expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In 4consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 5Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 6and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 7suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 8alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 9Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025. 10    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which 11suspended students, including those students suspended from 12the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 13school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 14equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of 15a student's parent or guardian to notify school officials that 16a student suspended from the school bus does not have 17alternate transportation to school. 18    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a 19local mental health agency to consult with the board at the 20meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be 21the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.22    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 23provide ongoing professional development to all school 24personnel, school board members, school safety officers, and 25school resource officers, on the requirements of this Section 26and Section 10-20.14, the adverse consequences of school   HB1583- 14 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1exclusion and justice-system involvement, effective classroom 2management strategies, culturally responsive discipline, 3trauma-responsive learning environments, as defined in 4subsection (b) of Section 3-11, the appropriate and available 5supportive services for the promotion of student attendance 6and engagement, and developmentally appropriate disciplinary 7methods that promote positive and healthy school climates. 8    (d) The board may expel a student for a definite period of 9time not to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a 10case-by-case basis. A student who is determined to have 11brought one of the following objects to school, any 12school-sponsored activity or event, or any activity or event 13that bears a reasonable relationship to school shall be 14expelled for a period of not less than one year:15        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 16    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 17    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 18    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 19    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section 20    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period 21    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the 22    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 23    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.24        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 25    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other 26    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily   HB1583- 15 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 2    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion 3    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 4    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination 5    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 6Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 7consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 8Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 9expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a 10transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with 11Article 13A of the School Code.12    (d-5) The board may suspend or by regulation authorize the 13superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 14principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend a 15student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or may expel 16a student for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 17calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) 18that student has been determined to have made an explicit 19threat on an Internet website against a school employee, a 20student, or any school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet 21website through which the threat was made is a site that was 22accessible within the school at the time the threat was made or 23was available to third parties who worked or studied within 24the school grounds at the time the threat was made, and (iii) 25the threat could be reasonably interpreted as threatening to 26the safety and security of the threatened individual because   HB1583- 16 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1of the individual's duties or employment status or status as a 2student inside the school. 3    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 4authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as 5lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 6equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 7personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 8without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 9search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General 10Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of 11privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 12left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 13the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 14conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 15lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 16controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 17illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 18searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs. 19If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces 20evidence that the student has violated or is violating either 21the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules, 22such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 23disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 24turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.25    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or 26expulsion from school and all school activities and a   HB1583- 17 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1prohibition from being present on school grounds.2    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if 3a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 4public or private school in this or any other state, the 5student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 6expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 7of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 8under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 9school district if there is no threat to the safety of students 10or staff in the alternative program.11    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 12students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 13difficulties.14    (i) A student may not be issued a monetary fine or fee as a 15disciplinary consequence, though this shall not preclude 16requiring a student to provide restitution for lost, stolen, 17or damaged property.18    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall 19apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 20special charter districts, and school districts organized 21under Article 34 of this Code. 22    (k) The expulsion of students enrolled in programs funded 23under Section 1C-2 of this Code is subject to the requirements 24under paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 2-3.71 of 25this Code.26    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school   HB1583- 18 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 2focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 3positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 4A school district may employ a school social worker or a 5licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school 6suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12. 7(Source: P.A. 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 8103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 8-9-24; revised 9-25-24.) 9    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 102-466)10    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 11searches. 12    (a) To expel students guilty of gross disobedience or 13misconduct, including gross disobedience or misconduct 14perpetuated by electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) 15of this Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 16expulsion. Expulsion shall take place only after the parents 17or guardians have been requested to appear at a meeting of the 18board, or with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss 19their child's behavior. Such request shall be made by 20registered or certified mail and shall state the time, place 21and purpose of the meeting. The board, or a hearing officer 22appointed by it, at such meeting shall state the reasons for 23dismissal and the date on which the expulsion is to become 24effective. If a hearing officer is appointed by the board, the 25hearing officer shall report to the board a written summary of   HB1583- 19 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1the evidence heard at the meeting and the board may take such 2action thereon as it finds appropriate. If the board acts to 3expel a student, the written expulsion decision shall detail 4the specific reasons why removing the student from the 5learning environment is in the best interest of the school. 6The expulsion decision shall also include a rationale as to 7the specific duration of the expulsion. An expelled student 8may be immediately transferred to an alternative program in 9the manner provided in Article 13A or 13B of this Code. A 10student must not be denied transfer because of the expulsion, 11except in cases in which such transfer is deemed to cause a 12threat to the safety of students or staff in the alternative 13program. 14    (b) To suspend or by policy to authorize the 15superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 16principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend 17students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, or to 18suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct on 19the school bus from riding the school bus, pursuant to 20subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this Section, and no action 21shall lie against them for such suspension. The board may by 22policy authorize the superintendent of the district or the 23principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 24school to suspend students guilty of such acts for a period not 25to exceed 10 school days. If a student is suspended due to 26gross disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board   HB1583- 20 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1may suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety 2reasons. 3    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 4parents or guardians of a student along with a full statement 5of the reasons for such suspension and a notice of their right 6to a review. The school board must be given a summary of the 7notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 8suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardians, 9the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall 10review such action of the superintendent or principal, 11assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 12parents or guardians of the student may appear and discuss the 13suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing 14officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 15a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After 16its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 17hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds 18appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 19subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 20decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or 21misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 22suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the 23specific duration of the suspension.24    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 25and consequences available to school officials, school 26exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions,   HB1583- 21 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1are the most serious. School officials shall limit the number 2and duration of expulsions and suspensions to the greatest 3extent practicable, and it is recommended that they use them 4only for legitimate educational purposes. To ensure that 5students are not excluded from school unnecessarily, it is 6recommended that school officials consider forms of 7non-exclusionary discipline prior to using out-of-school 8suspensions or expulsions. 9    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this 10Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies 11by which school administrators are required to suspend or 12expel students for particular behaviors.13    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be 14used only if the student's continuing presence in school would 15pose a threat to school safety or a disruption to other 16students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 17subsection (b-15), "threat to school safety or a disruption to 18other students' learning opportunities" shall be determined on 19a case-by-case basis by the school board or its designee. 20School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve 21such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 22length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.23    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 24out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions, 25and disciplinary removals to alternative schools may be used 26only if other appropriate and available behavioral and   HB1583- 22 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1disciplinary interventions have been exhausted and the 2student's continuing presence in school would either (i) pose 3a threat to the safety of other students, staff, or members of 4the school community or (ii) substantially disrupt, impede, or 5interfere with the operation of the school. For purposes of 6this subsection (b-20), "threat to the safety of other 7students, staff, or members of the school community" and 8"substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the 9operation of the school" shall be determined on a case-by-case 10basis by school officials. For purposes of this subsection 11(b-20), the determination of whether "appropriate and 12available behavioral and disciplinary interventions have been 13exhausted" shall be made by school officials. School officials 14shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve such threats, 15address such disruptions, and minimize the length of student 16exclusions to the greatest extent practicable. Within the 17suspension decision described in subsection (b) of this 18Section or the expulsion decision described in subsection (a) 19of this Section, it shall be documented whether other 20interventions were attempted or whether it was determined that 21there were no other appropriate and available interventions.22    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 23than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 24support services during the period of their suspension. For 25purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 26support services" shall be determined by school authorities.   HB1583- 23 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1Within the suspension decision described in subsection (b) of 2this Section, it shall be documented whether such services are 3to be provided or whether it was determined that there are no 4such appropriate and available services. 5    A school district may refer students who are expelled to 6appropriate and available support services.7    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 8re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school, 9expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In 10consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 11Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 12and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 13suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 14alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 15Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025. 16    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which 17suspended students, including those students suspended from 18the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 19school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 20equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of 21a student's parents or guardians to notify school officials 22that a student suspended from the school bus does not have 23alternate transportation to school. 24    (b-35) In all suspension review hearings conducted under 25subsection (b) or expulsion hearings conducted under 26subsection (a), a student may disclose any factor to be   HB1583- 24 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1considered in mitigation, including his or her status as a 2parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 3violence, as defined in Article 26A. A representative of the 4parent's or guardian's choice, or of the student's choice if 5emancipated, must be permitted to represent the student 6throughout the proceedings and to address the school board or 7its appointed hearing officer. With the approval of the 8student's parent or guardian, or of the student if 9emancipated, a support person must be permitted to accompany 10the student to any disciplinary hearings or proceedings. The 11representative or support person must comply with any rules of 12the school district's hearing process. If the representative 13or support person violates the rules or engages in behavior or 14advocacy that harasses, abuses, or intimidates either party, a 15witness, or anyone else in attendance at the hearing, the 16representative or support person may be prohibited from 17further participation in the hearing or proceeding. A 18suspension or expulsion proceeding under this subsection 19(b-35) must be conducted independently from any ongoing 20criminal investigation or proceeding, and an absence of 21pending or possible criminal charges, criminal investigations, 22or proceedings may not be a factor in school disciplinary 23decisions.24    (b-40) During a suspension review hearing conducted under 25subsection (b) or an expulsion hearing conducted under 26subsection (a) that involves allegations of sexual violence by   HB1583- 25 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1the student who is subject to discipline, neither the student 2nor his or her representative shall directly question nor have 3direct contact with the alleged victim. The student who is 4subject to discipline or his or her representative may, at the 5discretion and direction of the school board or its appointed 6hearing officer, suggest questions to be posed by the school 7board or its appointed hearing officer to the alleged victim. 8    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a 9local mental health agency to consult with the board at the 10meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be 11the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.12    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 13provide ongoing professional development to all school 14personnel, school board members, school safety officers, and 15school resource officers on the requirements of this Section 16and Section 10-20.14, the adverse consequences of school 17exclusion and justice-system involvement, effective classroom 18management strategies, culturally responsive discipline, 19trauma-responsive learning environments, as defined in 20subsection (b) of Section 3-11, the appropriate and available 21supportive services for the promotion of student attendance 22and engagement, and developmentally appropriate disciplinary 23methods that promote positive and healthy school climates. 24    (d) The board may expel a student for a definite period of 25time not to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a 26case-by-case basis. A student who is determined to have   HB1583- 26 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1brought one of the following objects to school, any 2school-sponsored activity or event, or any activity or event 3that bears a reasonable relationship to school shall be 4expelled for a period of not less than one year:5        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 6    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 7    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 8    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 9    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section 10    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period 11    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the 12    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 13    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.14        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 15    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other 16    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily 17    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 18    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion 19    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 20    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination 21    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 22Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 23consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 24Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 25expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a 26transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with   HB1583- 27 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1Article 13A of the School Code.2    (d-5) The board may suspend or by regulation authorize the 3superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 4principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend a 5student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or may expel 6a student for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 7calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) 8that student has been determined to have made an explicit 9threat on an Internet website against a school employee, a 10student, or any school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet 11website through which the threat was made is a site that was 12accessible within the school at the time the threat was made or 13was available to third parties who worked or studied within 14the school grounds at the time the threat was made, and (iii) 15the threat could be reasonably interpreted as threatening to 16the safety and security of the threatened individual because 17of the individual's duties or employment status or status as a 18student inside the school. 19    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 20authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as 21lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 22equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 23personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 24without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 25search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General 26Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of   HB1583- 28 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 2left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 3the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 4conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 5lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 6controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 7illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 8searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs. 9If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces 10evidence that the student has violated or is violating either 11the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules, 12such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 13disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 14turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.15    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or 16expulsion from school and all school activities and a 17prohibition from being present on school grounds.18    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if 19a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 20public or private school in this or any other state, the 21student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 22expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 23of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 24under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 25school district if there is no threat to the safety of students 26or staff in the alternative program. A school district that   HB1583- 29 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1adopts a policy under this subsection (g) must include a 2provision allowing for consideration of any mitigating 3factors, including, but not limited to, a student's status as 4a parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 5violence, as defined in Article 26A. 6    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 7students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 8difficulties.9    (i) A student may not be issued a monetary fine or fee as a 10disciplinary consequence, though this shall not preclude 11requiring a student to provide restitution for lost, stolen, 12or damaged property.13    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall 14apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 15special charter districts, and school districts organized 16under Article 34 of this Code. 17    (k) Through June 30, 2026, the expulsion of students 18enrolled in programs funded under Section 1C-2 of this Code is 19subject to the requirements under paragraph (7) of subsection 20(a) of Section 2-3.71 of this Code.21    (k-5) On and after July 1, 2026, the expulsion of children 22enrolled in programs funded under Section 15-25 of the 23Department of Early Childhood Act is subject to the 24requirements of paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 2515-30 of the Department of Early Childhood Act. 26    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school   HB1583- 30 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 2focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 3positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 4A school district may employ a school social worker or a 5licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school 6suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12. 7(Source: P.A. 102-466, eff. 7-1-25; 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 8102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 98-9-24; revised 9-25-24.) 10    (105 ILCS 5/17-2.11)  (from Ch. 122, par. 17-2.11)11    Sec. 17-2.11. School board power to levy a tax or to borrow 12money and issue bonds for fire prevention, safety, energy 13conservation, accessibility, school security, and specified 14repair purposes.15    (a) Whenever, as a result of any lawful order of any 16agency, other than a school board, having authority to enforce 17any school building code applicable to any facility that 18houses students, or any law or regulation for the protection 19and safety of the environment, pursuant to the Environmental 20Protection Act, any school district having a population of 21less than 500,000 inhabitants is required to alter or 22reconstruct any school building or permanent, fixed equipment; 23the district may, by proper resolution, levy a tax for the 24purpose of making such alteration or reconstruction, based on 25a survey report by an architect or engineer licensed in this   HB1583- 31 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1State, upon all of the taxable property of the district at the 2value as assessed by the Department of Revenue and at a rate 3not to exceed 0.05% per year for a period sufficient to finance 4such alteration or reconstruction, upon the following 5conditions:6        (1) When there are not sufficient funds available in 7    the operations and maintenance fund of the school 8    district, the school facility occupation tax fund of the 9    district, or the fire prevention and safety fund of the 10    district, as determined by the district on the basis of 11    rules adopted by the State Board of Education, to make 12    such alteration or reconstruction or to purchase and 13    install such permanent, fixed equipment so ordered or 14    determined as necessary. Appropriate school district 15    records must be made available to the State Superintendent 16    of Education, upon request, to confirm this insufficiency.17        (2) When a certified estimate of an architect or 18    engineer licensed in this State stating the estimated 19    amount necessary to make the alteration or reconstruction 20    or to purchase and install the equipment so ordered has 21    been secured by the school district, and the estimate has 22    been approved by the regional superintendent of schools 23    having jurisdiction over the district and the State 24    Superintendent of Education. Approval must not be granted 25    for any work that has already started without the prior 26    express authorization of the State Superintendent of   HB1583- 32 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    Education. If the estimate is not approved or is denied 2    approval by the regional superintendent of schools within 3    3 months after the date on which it is submitted to him or 4    her, the school board of the district may submit the 5    estimate directly to the State Superintendent of Education 6    for approval or denial.7    In the case of an emergency situation, where the estimated 8cost to effectuate emergency repairs is less than the amount 9specified in Section 10-20.21 of this Code, the school 10district may proceed with such repairs prior to approval by 11the State Superintendent of Education, but shall comply with 12the provisions of subdivision (2) of this subsection (a) as 13soon thereafter as may be as well as Section 10-20.21 of this 14Code. If the estimated cost to effectuate emergency repairs is 15greater than the amount specified in Section 10-20.21 of this 16Code, then the school district shall proceed in conformity 17with Section 10-20.21 of this Code and with rules established 18by the State Board of Education to address such situations. 19The rules adopted by the State Board of Education to deal with 20these situations shall stipulate that emergency situations 21must be expedited and given priority consideration. For 22purposes of this paragraph, an emergency is a situation that 23presents an imminent and continuing threat to the health and 24safety of students or other occupants of a facility, requires 25complete or partial evacuation of a building or part of a 26building, or consumes one or more of the 5 emergency days built   HB1583- 33 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1into the adopted calendar of the school or schools or would 2otherwise be expected to cause such school or schools to fall 3short of the minimum school calendar requirements. 4    (b) Whenever any such district determines that it is 5necessary for energy conservation purposes that any school 6building or permanent, fixed equipment should be altered or 7reconstructed and that such alterations or reconstruction will 8be made with funds not necessary for the completion of 9approved and recommended projects contained in any safety 10survey report or amendments thereto authorized by Section 112-3.12 of this Act; the district may levy a tax or issue bonds 12as provided in subsection (a) of this Section.13    (c) Whenever any such district determines that it is 14necessary for accessibility purposes and to comply with the 15school building code that any school building or equipment 16should be altered or reconstructed and that such alterations 17or reconstruction will be made with funds not necessary for 18the completion of approved and recommended projects contained 19in any safety survey report or amendments thereto authorized 20under Section 2-3.12 of this Act, the district may levy a tax 21or issue bonds as provided in subsection (a) of this Section.22    (d) Whenever any such district determines that it is 23necessary for school security purposes and the related 24protection and safety of pupils and school personnel that any 25school building or property should be altered or reconstructed 26or that security systems and equipment (including but not   HB1583- 34 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1limited to intercom, early detection and warning, access 2control and television monitoring systems) should be purchased 3and installed, and that such alterations, reconstruction or 4purchase and installation of equipment will be made with funds 5not necessary for the completion of approved and recommended 6projects contained in any safety survey report or amendment 7thereto authorized by Section 2-3.12 of this Act and will 8deter and prevent unauthorized entry or activities upon school 9property by unknown or dangerous persons, assure early 10detection and advance warning of any such actual or attempted 11unauthorized entry or activities and help assure the continued 12safety of pupils and school staff if any such unauthorized 13entry or activity is attempted or occurs; the district may 14levy a tax or issue bonds as provided in subsection (a) of this 15Section.16    If such a school district determines that it is necessary 17for school security purposes and the related protection and 18safety of pupils and school staff to hire a school resource 19officer or that personnel costs for school counselors, mental 20health experts, school safety officers, or school resource 21officers are necessary and the district determines that it 22does not need funds for any of the other purposes set forth in 23this Section, then the district may levy a tax or issue bonds 24as provided in subsection (a). 25    (e) If a school district does not need funds for other fire 26prevention and safety projects, including the completion of   HB1583- 35 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1approved and recommended projects contained in any safety 2survey report or amendments thereto authorized by Section 32-3.12 of this Act, and it is determined after a public hearing 4(which is preceded by at least one published notice (i) 5occurring at least 7 days prior to the hearing in a newspaper 6of general circulation within the school district and (ii) 7setting forth the time, date, place, and general subject 8matter of the hearing) that there is a substantial, immediate, 9and otherwise unavoidable threat to the health, safety, or 10welfare of pupils due to disrepair of school sidewalks, 11playgrounds, parking lots, or school bus turnarounds and 12repairs must be made; then the district may levy a tax or issue 13bonds as provided in subsection (a) of this Section.14    (f) For purposes of this Section a school district may 15replace a school building or build additions to replace 16portions of a building when it is determined that the 17effectuation of the recommendations for the existing building 18will cost more than the replacement costs. Such determination 19shall be based on a comparison of estimated costs made by an 20architect or engineer licensed in the State of Illinois. The 21new building or addition shall be equivalent in area (square 22feet) and comparable in purpose and grades served and may be on 23the same site or another site. Such replacement may only be 24done upon order of the regional superintendent of schools and 25the approval of the State Superintendent of Education.26    (g) The filing of a certified copy of the resolution   HB1583- 36 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1levying the tax when accompanied by the certificates of the 2regional superintendent of schools and State Superintendent of 3Education shall be the authority of the county clerk to extend 4such tax.5    (h) The county clerk of the county in which any school 6district levying a tax under the authority of this Section is 7located, in reducing raised levies, shall not consider any 8such tax as a part of the general levy for school purposes and 9shall not include the same in the limitation of any other tax 10rate which may be extended.11    Such tax shall be levied and collected in like manner as 12all other taxes of school districts, subject to the provisions 13contained in this Section.14    (i) The tax rate limit specified in this Section may be 15increased to .10% upon the approval of a proposition to effect 16such increase by a majority of the electors voting on that 17proposition at a regular scheduled election. Such proposition 18may be initiated by resolution of the school board and shall be 19certified by the secretary to the proper election authorities 20for submission in accordance with the general election law.21    (j) When taxes are levied by any school district for fire 22prevention, safety, energy conservation, and school security 23purposes as specified in this Section, and the purposes for 24which the taxes have been levied are accomplished and paid in 25full, and there remain funds on hand in the Fire Prevention and 26Safety Fund from the proceeds of the taxes levied, including   HB1583- 37 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1interest earnings thereon, the school board by resolution 2shall use such excess and other board restricted funds, 3excluding bond proceeds and earnings from such proceeds, as 4follows:5        (1) for other authorized fire prevention, safety, 6    energy conservation, required safety inspections, school 7    security purposes, sampling for lead in drinking water in 8    schools, and for repair and mitigation due to lead levels 9    in the drinking water supply; or10        (2) for transfer to the Operations and Maintenance 11    Fund for the purpose of abating an equal amount of 12    operations and maintenance purposes taxes.13Notwithstanding subdivision (2) of this subsection (j) and 14subsection (k) of this Section, through June 30, 2021, the 15school board may, by proper resolution following a public 16hearing set by the school board or the president of the school 17board (that is preceded (i) by at least one published notice 18over the name of the clerk or secretary of the board, occurring 19at least 7 days and not more than 30 days prior to the hearing, 20in a newspaper of general circulation within the school 21district and (ii) by posted notice over the name of the clerk 22or secretary of the board, at least 48 hours before the 23hearing, at the principal office of the school board or at the 24building where the hearing is to be held if a principal office 25does not exist, with both notices setting forth the time, 26date, place, and subject matter of the hearing), transfer   HB1583- 38 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1surplus life safety taxes and interest earnings thereon to the 2Operations and Maintenance Fund for building repair work. 3    (k) If any transfer is made to the Operation and 4Maintenance Fund, the secretary of the school board shall 5within 30 days notify the county clerk of the amount of that 6transfer and direct the clerk to abate the taxes to be extended 7for the purposes of operations and maintenance authorized 8under Section 17-2 of this Act by an amount equal to such 9transfer.10    (l) If the proceeds from the tax levy authorized by this 11Section are insufficient to complete the work approved under 12this Section, the school board is authorized to sell bonds 13without referendum under the provisions of this Section in an 14amount that, when added to the proceeds of the tax levy 15authorized by this Section, will allow completion of the 16approved work.17    (m) Any bonds issued pursuant to this Section shall bear 18interest at a rate not to exceed the maximum rate authorized by 19law at the time of the making of the contract, shall mature 20within 20 years from date, and shall be signed by the president 21of the school board and the treasurer of the school district. 22The authorized amount of bonds issued pursuant to this Section 23may be increased by an amount not to exceed 3% of that 24authorized amount to provide for expenses of issuing the 25bonds, including underwriter's compensation and costs of bond 26insurance or other credit enhancement, and also an amount to   HB1583- 39 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1pay capitalized interest as otherwise permitted by law. 2    (n) In order to authorize and issue such bonds, the school 3board shall adopt a resolution fixing the amount of bonds, the 4date thereof, the maturities thereof, rates of interest 5thereof, place of payment and denomination, which shall be in 6denominations of not less than $100 and not more than $5,000, 7and provide for the levy and collection of a direct annual tax 8upon all the taxable property in the school district 9sufficient to pay the principal and interest on such bonds to 10maturity. Upon the filing in the office of the county clerk of 11the county in which the school district is located of a 12certified copy of the resolution, it is the duty of the county 13clerk to extend the tax therefor in addition to and in excess 14of all other taxes heretofore or hereafter authorized to be 15levied by such school district.16    (o) After the time such bonds are issued as provided for by 17this Section, if additional alterations or reconstructions are 18required to be made because of surveys conducted by an 19architect or engineer licensed in the State of Illinois, the 20district may levy a tax at a rate not to exceed .05% per year 21upon all the taxable property of the district or issue 22additional bonds, whichever action shall be the most feasible.23    (p) This Section is cumulative and constitutes complete 24authority for the issuance of bonds as provided in this 25Section notwithstanding any other statute or law to the 26contrary.  HB1583- 40 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    (q) With respect to instruments for the payment of money 2issued under this Section either before, on, or after the 3effective date of Public Act 86-004 (June 6, 1989), it is, and 4always has been, the intention of the General Assembly (i) 5that the Omnibus Bond Acts are, and always have been, 6supplementary grants of power to issue instruments in 7accordance with the Omnibus Bond Acts, regardless of any 8provision of this Act that may appear to be or to have been 9more restrictive than those Acts, (ii) that the provisions of 10this Section are not a limitation on the supplementary 11authority granted by the Omnibus Bond Acts, and (iii) that 12instruments issued under this Section within the supplementary 13authority granted by the Omnibus Bond Acts are not invalid 14because of any provision of this Act that may appear to be or 15to have been more restrictive than those Acts.16    (r) When the purposes for which the bonds are issued have 17been accomplished and paid for in full and there remain funds 18on hand from the proceeds of the bond sale and interest 19earnings therefrom, the board shall, by resolution, use such 20excess funds in accordance with the provisions of Section 2110-22.14 of this Act.22    (s) Whenever any tax is levied or bonds issued for fire 23prevention, safety, energy conservation, and school security 24purposes, such proceeds shall be deposited and accounted for 25separately within the Fire Prevention and Safety Fund.26(Source: P.A. 103-591, eff. 7-1-24.)   HB1583- 41 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    (105 ILCS 5/22-85)2    Sec. 22-85. Sexual abuse at schools.3    (a) The General Assembly finds that: 4        (1) investigation of a child regarding an incident of 5    sexual abuse can induce significant trauma for the child;6        (2) it is desirable to prevent multiple interviews of 7    a child at a school; and8        (3) it is important to recognize the role of 9    Children's Advocacy Centers in conducting developmentally 10    appropriate investigations. 11    (b) In this Section:12    "Alleged incident of sexual abuse" is limited to an 13incident of sexual abuse of a child that is alleged to have 14been perpetrated by school personnel, including a school 15vendor or volunteer, that occurred (i) on school grounds or 16during a school activity or (ii) outside of school grounds or 17not during a school activity. 18    "Appropriate law enforcement agency" means a law 19enforcement agency whose employees have been involved, in some 20capacity, with an investigation of a particular alleged 21incident of sexual abuse. 22    (c) If a mandated reporter within a school has knowledge 23of an alleged incident of sexual abuse, the reporter must call 24the Department of Children and Family Services' hotline 25established under Section 7.6 of the Abused and Neglected   HB1583- 42 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1Child Reporting Act immediately after obtaining the minimal 2information necessary to make a report, including the names of 3the affected parties and the allegations. The State Board of 4Education must make available materials detailing the 5information that is necessary to enable notification to the 6Department of Children and Family Services of an alleged 7incident of sexual abuse. Each school must ensure that 8mandated reporters review the State Board of Education's 9materials and materials developed by the Department of 10Children and Family Services and distributed in the school 11building under Section 7 of the Abused and Neglected Child 12Reporting Act at least once annually.13    (d) For schools in a county with an accredited Children's 14Advocacy Center, every alleged incident of sexual abuse that 15is reported to the Department of Children and Family Services' 16hotline or a law enforcement agency and is subsequently 17accepted for investigation must be referred by the entity that 18received the report to the local Children's Advocacy Center 19pursuant to that county's multidisciplinary team's protocol 20under the Children's Advocacy Center Act for investigating 21child sexual abuse allegations.22    (e) A county's local Children's Advocacy Center must, at a 23minimum, do both of the following regarding a referred case of 24an alleged incident of sexual abuse: 25        (1) Coordinate the investigation of the alleged 26    incident, as governed by the local Children's Advocacy   HB1583- 43 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    Center's existing multidisciplinary team protocol and 2    according to National Children's Alliance accreditation 3    standards.4        (2) Facilitate communication between the 5    multidisciplinary team investigating the alleged incident 6    of sexual abuse and, if applicable, the referring school's 7    (i) Title IX officer, or his or her designee, (ii) school 8    resource officer, or (iii) personnel, or (iv) school 9    safety officer leading the school's investigation into the 10    alleged incident of sexual abuse. If a school uses a 11    designated entity to investigate a sexual abuse 12    allegation, the multidisciplinary team may correspond only 13    with that entity and any reference in this Section to 14    "school" refers to that designated entity. This 15    facilitation of communication must, at a minimum, ensure 16    that all applicable parties have each other's contact 17    information and must share the county's local Children's 18    Advocacy Center's protocol regarding the process of 19    approving the viewing of a forensic interview, as defined 20    under Section 2.5 of the Children's Advocacy Center Act, 21    by school personnel and a contact person for questions 22    relating to the protocol. 23    (f) After an alleged incident of sexual abuse is accepted 24for investigation by the Department of Children and Family 25Services or a law enforcement agency and while the criminal 26and child abuse investigations related to that alleged   HB1583- 44 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1incident are being conducted by the local multidisciplinary 2team, the school relevant to the alleged incident of sexual 3abuse must comply with both of the following:4        (1) It may not interview the alleged victim regarding 5    details of the alleged incident of sexual abuse until 6    after the completion of the forensic interview of that 7    victim is conducted at a Children's Advocacy Center. This 8    paragraph does not prohibit a school from requesting 9    information from the alleged victim or his or her parent 10    or guardian to ensure the safety and well-being of the 11    alleged victim at school during an investigation.12        (2) If asked by a law enforcement agency or an 13    investigator of the Department of Children and Family 14    Services who is conducting the investigation, it must 15    inform those individuals of any evidence the school has 16    gathered pertaining to an alleged incident of sexual 17    abuse, as permissible by federal or State law. 18    (g) After completion of a forensic interview, the 19multidisciplinary team must notify the school relevant to the 20alleged incident of sexual abuse of its completion. If, for 21any reason, a multidisciplinary team determines it will not 22conduct a forensic interview in a specific investigation, the 23multidisciplinary team must notify the school as soon as the 24determination is made. If a forensic interview has not been 25conducted within 15 calendar days after opening an 26investigation, the school may notify the multidisciplinary   HB1583- 45 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1team that it intends to interview the alleged victim. No later 2than 10 calendar days after this notification, the 3multidisciplinary team may conduct the forensic interview and, 4if the multidisciplinary team does not conduct the interview, 5the school may proceed with its interview.6    (h) To the greatest extent possible considering student 7safety and Title IX compliance, school personnel may view the 8electronic recordings of a forensic interview of an alleged 9victim of an incident of sexual abuse. As a means to avoid 10additional interviews of an alleged victim, school personnel 11must be granted viewing access to the electronic recording of 12a forensic interview conducted at an accredited Children's 13Advocacy Center for an alleged incident of sexual abuse only 14if the school receives (i) approval from the multidisciplinary 15team investigating the case and (ii) informed consent by a 16child over the age of 13 or the child's parent or guardian. 17Each county's local Children's Advocacy Center and 18multidisciplinary team must establish an internal protocol 19regarding the process of approving the viewing of the forensic 20interview, and this process and the contact person must be 21shared with the school contact at the time of the initial 22facilitation. Whenever possible, the school's viewing of the 23electronic recording of a forensic interview should be 24conducted in lieu of the need for additional interviews.25    (i) For an alleged incident of sexual abuse that has been 26accepted for investigation by a multidisciplinary team, if,   HB1583- 46 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1during the course of its internal investigation and at any 2point during or after the multidisciplinary team's 3investigation, the school determines that it needs to 4interview the alleged victim to successfully complete its 5investigation and the victim is under 18 years of age, a child 6advocate must be made available to the student and may be 7present during the school's interview. A child advocate may be 8a school social worker, a school or equally qualified 9psychologist, or a person in a position the State Board of 10Education has identified as an appropriate advocate for the 11student during a school's investigation into an alleged 12incident of sexual abuse.13    (j) The Department of Children and Family Services must 14notify the relevant school when an agency investigation of an 15alleged incident of sexual abuse is complete. The notification 16must include information on the outcome of that investigation.17    (k) The appropriate law enforcement agency must notify the 18relevant school when an agency investigation of an alleged 19incident of sexual abuse is complete or has been suspended. 20The notification must include information on the outcome of 21that investigation.22    (l) This Section applies to all schools operating under 23this Code, including, but not limited to, public schools 24located in cities having a population of more than 500,000, a 25school operated pursuant to an agreement with a public school 26district, alternative schools operated by third parties, an   HB1583- 47 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1alternative learning opportunities program, a public school 2administered by a local public agency or the Department of 3Human Services, charter schools operating under the authority 4of Article 27A, and non-public schools recognized by the State 5Board of Education. 6(Source: P.A. 101-531, eff. 8-23-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 7    (105 ILCS 5/22-88)8    Sec. 22-88. Parental notification of law enforcement 9detainment and questioning on school grounds.10    (a) In this Section, "school grounds" means the real 11property comprising an active and operational elementary or 12secondary school during the regular hours in which school is 13in session and when students are present. 14    (b) Before detaining and questioning a student on school 15grounds who is under 18 years of age and who is suspected of 16committing a criminal act, a law enforcement officer, a school 17resource officer, school safety officer, or other school 18security personnel must do all of the following:19        (1) Ensure that notification or attempted notification 20    of the student's parent or guardian is made.21        (2) Document the time and manner in which the 22    notification or attempted notification under paragraph (1) 23    occurred.24        (3) Make reasonable efforts to ensure that the 25    student's parent or guardian is present during the   HB1583- 48 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    questioning or, if the parent or guardian is not present, 2    ensure that school personnel, including, but not limited 3    to, a school social worker, a school psychologist, a 4    school nurse, a school counselor, or any other mental 5    health professional, are present during the questioning.6        (4) If practicable, make reasonable efforts to ensure 7    that a law enforcement officer trained in promoting safe 8    interactions and communications with youth is present 9    during the questioning. An officer who received training 10    in youth investigations approved or certified by his or 11    her law enforcement agency or under Section 10.22 of the 12    Police Training Act or a juvenile police officer, as 13    defined under Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 14    1987, satisfies the requirement under this paragraph.15    (c) This Section does not limit the authority of a law 16enforcement officer to make an arrest on school grounds. This 17Section does not apply to circumstances that would cause a 18reasonable person to believe that urgent and immediate action 19is necessary to do any of the following:20        (1) Prevent bodily harm or injury to the student or 21    any other person.22        (2) Apprehend an armed or fleeing suspect.23        (3) Prevent the destruction of evidence.24        (4) Address an emergency or other dangerous situation. 25(Source: P.A. 101-478, eff. 8-23-19; 102-197, eff. 7-30-21; 26102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)   HB1583- 49 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    (105 ILCS 5/26A-20)2    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 3delayed effective date)4    Sec. 26A-20. Review and revision of policies and 5procedures.6    (a) No later than July 1, 2024 and every 2 years 7thereafter, each school district must review all existing 8policies and procedures and must revise any existing policies 9and procedures that may act as a barrier to the immediate 10enrollment and re-enrollment, attendance, graduation, and 11success in school of any student who is a student parent, 12expectant student parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 13violence or any policies or procedures that may compromise a 14criminal investigation relating to domestic or sexual violence 15or may re-victimize students. A school district must adopt new 16policies and procedures, as needed, to implement this Section 17and to ensure that immediate and effective steps are taken to 18respond to students who are student parents, expectant 19parents, or victims of domestic or sexual violence.20    (b) A school district's policy must be consistent with the 21model policy and procedures adopted by the State Board of 22Education and under Public Act 101-531.23    (c) A school district's policy on the procedures that a 24student or his or her parent or guardian may follow if he or 25she chooses to report an incident of alleged domestic or   HB1583- 50 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1sexual violence must, at a minimum, include all of the 2following: 3        (1) The name and contact information for domestic or 4    sexual violence and parenting resource personnel, the 5    Title IX coordinator, school and school district resource 6    officers, school safety officers, or security, and a 7    community-based domestic or sexual violence organization.8        (2) The name, title, and contact information for 9    confidential resources and a description of what 10    confidential reporting means.11        (3) An option for the student or the student's parent 12    or guardian to electronically, anonymously, and 13    confidentially report the incident.14        (4) An option for reports by third parties and 15    bystanders.16        (5) Information regarding the various individuals, 17    departments, or organizations to whom a student may report 18    an incident of domestic or sexual violence, specifying for 19    each individual or entity (i) the extent of the 20    individual's or entity's reporting obligation to the 21    school's or school district's administration, Title IX 22    coordinator, or other personnel or entity, (ii) the 23    individual's or entity's ability to protect the student's 24    privacy, and (iii) the extent of the individual's or 25    entity's ability to have confidential communications with 26    the student or his or her parent or guardian.  HB1583- 51 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1        (6) The adoption of a complaint resolution procedure 2    as provided in Section 26A-25. 3    (d) A school district must post its revised policies and 4procedures on its website, distribute them at the beginning of 5each school year to each student, and make copies available to 6each student and his or her parent or guardian for inspection 7and copying at no cost to the student or parent or guardian at 8each school within a school district. 9(Source: P.A. 102-466, eff. 7-1-25.) 10    (105 ILCS 5/27-23.7)11    Sec. 27-23.7. Bullying prevention.12    (a) The General Assembly finds that a safe and civil 13school environment is necessary for students to learn and 14achieve and that bullying causes physical, psychological, and 15emotional harm to students and interferes with students' 16ability to learn and participate in school activities. The 17General Assembly further finds that bullying has been linked 18to other forms of antisocial behavior, such as vandalism, 19shoplifting, skipping and dropping out of school, fighting, 20using drugs and alcohol, sexual harassment, and sexual 21violence. Because of the negative outcomes associated with 22bullying in schools, the General Assembly finds that school 23districts, charter schools, and non-public, non-sectarian 24elementary and secondary schools should educate students, 25parents, and school district, charter school, or non-public,   HB1583- 52 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1non-sectarian elementary or secondary school personnel about 2what behaviors constitute prohibited bullying.3    Bullying on the basis of actual or perceived race, color, 4religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, physical appearance, 5socioeconomic status, academic status, pregnancy, parenting 6status, homelessness, age, marital status, physical or mental 7disability, military status, sexual orientation, 8gender-related identity or expression, unfavorable discharge 9from military service, association with a person or group with 10one or more of the aforementioned actual or perceived 11characteristics, or any other distinguishing characteristic is 12prohibited in all school districts, charter schools, and 13non-public, non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools. No 14student shall be subjected to bullying:15        (1) during any school-sponsored education program or 16    activity;17        (2) while in school, on school property, on school 18    buses or other school vehicles, at designated school bus 19    stops waiting for the school bus, or at school-sponsored 20    or school-sanctioned events or activities;21        (3) through the transmission of information from a 22    school computer, a school computer network, or other 23    similar electronic school equipment; or 24        (4) through the transmission of information from a 25    computer that is accessed at a nonschool-related location, 26    activity, function, or program or from the use of   HB1583- 53 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    technology or an electronic device that is not owned, 2    leased, or used by a school district or school if the 3    bullying causes a substantial disruption to the 4    educational process or orderly operation of a school. This 5    item (4) applies only in cases in which a school 6    administrator or teacher receives a report that bullying 7    through this means has occurred and does not require a 8    district or school to staff or monitor any 9    nonschool-related activity, function, or program. 10    (a-5) Nothing in this Section is intended to infringe upon 11any right to exercise free expression or the free exercise of 12religion or religiously based views protected under the First 13Amendment to the United States Constitution or under Section 3 14of Article I of the Illinois Constitution. 15    (b) In this Section: 16    "Bullying" includes "cyber-bullying" and means any severe 17or pervasive physical or verbal act or conduct, including 18communications made in writing or electronically, directed 19toward a student or students that has or can be reasonably 20predicted to have the effect of one or more of the following:21        (1) placing the student or students in reasonable fear 22    of harm to the student's or students' person or property;23        (2) causing a substantially detrimental effect on the 24    student's or students' physical or mental health;25        (3) substantially interfering with the student's or 26    students' academic performance; or  HB1583- 54 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1        (4) substantially interfering with the student's or 2    students' ability to participate in or benefit from the 3    services, activities, or privileges provided by a school.4    Bullying, as defined in this subsection (b), may take 5various forms, including without limitation one or more of the 6following: harassment, threats, intimidation, stalking, 7physical violence, sexual harassment, sexual violence, theft, 8public humiliation, destruction of property, or retaliation 9for asserting or alleging an act of bullying. This list is 10meant to be illustrative and non-exhaustive.11    "Cyber-bullying" means bullying through the use of 12technology or any electronic communication, including without 13limitation any transfer of signs, signals, writing, images, 14sounds, data, or intelligence of any nature transmitted in 15whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic system, 16photoelectronic system, or photooptical system, including 17without limitation electronic mail, Internet communications, 18instant messages, or facsimile communications. 19"Cyber-bullying" includes the creation of a webpage or weblog 20in which the creator assumes the identity of another person or 21the knowing impersonation of another person as the author of 22posted content or messages if the creation or impersonation 23creates any of the effects enumerated in the definition of 24bullying in this Section. "Cyber-bullying" also includes the 25distribution by electronic means of a communication to more 26than one person or the posting of material on an electronic   HB1583- 55 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1medium that may be accessed by one or more persons if the 2distribution or posting creates any of the effects enumerated 3in the definition of bullying in this Section. 4    "Policy on bullying" means a bullying prevention policy 5that meets the following criteria:6        (1) Includes the bullying definition provided in this 7    Section.8        (2) Includes a statement that bullying is contrary to 9    State law and the policy of the school district, charter 10    school, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or 11    secondary school and is consistent with subsection (a-5) 12    of this Section.13        (3) Includes procedures for promptly reporting 14    bullying, including, but not limited to, identifying and 15    providing the school e-mail address (if applicable) and 16    school telephone number for the staff person or persons 17    responsible for receiving such reports and a procedure for 18    anonymous reporting; however, this shall not be construed 19    to permit formal disciplinary action solely on the basis 20    of an anonymous report.21        (4) Consistent with federal and State laws and rules 22    governing student privacy rights, includes procedures for 23    informing parents or guardians of all students involved in 24    the alleged incident of bullying within 24 hours after the 25    school's administration is made aware of the students' 26    involvement in the incident and discussing, as   HB1583- 56 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    appropriate, the availability of social work services, 2    counseling, school psychological services, other 3    interventions, and restorative measures. The school shall 4    make diligent efforts to notify a parent or legal 5    guardian, utilizing all contact information the school has 6    available or that can be reasonably obtained by the school 7    within the 24-hour period. 8        (5) Contains procedures for promptly investigating and 9    addressing reports of bullying, including the following:10            (A) Making all reasonable efforts to complete the 11        investigation within 10 school days after the date the 12        report of the incident of bullying was received and 13        taking into consideration additional relevant 14        information received during the course of the 15        investigation about the reported incident of bullying.16            (B) Involving appropriate school support personnel 17        and other staff persons with knowledge, experience, 18        and training on bullying prevention, as deemed 19        appropriate, in the investigation process.20            (C) Notifying the principal or school 21        administrator or his or her designee of the report of 22        the incident of bullying as soon as possible after the 23        report is received.24            (D) Consistent with federal and State laws and 25        rules governing student privacy rights, providing 26        parents and guardians of the students who are parties   HB1583- 57 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1        to the investigation information about the 2        investigation and an opportunity to meet with the 3        principal or school administrator or his or her 4        designee to discuss the investigation, the findings of 5        the investigation, and the actions taken to address 6        the reported incident of bullying.7        (6) Includes the interventions that can be taken to 8    address bullying, which may include, but are not limited 9    to, school social work services, restorative measures, 10    social-emotional skill building, counseling, school 11    psychological services, and community-based services.12        (7) Includes a statement prohibiting reprisal or 13    retaliation against any person who reports an act of 14    bullying and the consequences and appropriate remedial 15    actions for a person who engages in reprisal or 16    retaliation.17        (8) Includes consequences and appropriate remedial 18    actions for a person found to have falsely accused another 19    of bullying as a means of retaliation or as a means of 20    bullying.21        (9) Is based on the engagement of a range of school 22    stakeholders, including students and parents or guardians.23        (10) Is posted on the school district's, charter 24    school's, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or 25    secondary school's existing, publicly accessible Internet 26    website, is included in the student handbook, and, where   HB1583- 58 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    applicable, posted where other policies, rules, and 2    standards of conduct are currently posted in the school 3    and provided periodically throughout the school year to 4    students and faculty, and is distributed annually to 5    parents, guardians, students, and school personnel, 6    including new employees when hired.7        (11) As part of the process of reviewing and 8    re-evaluating the policy under subsection (d) of this 9    Section, contains a policy evaluation process to assess 10    the outcomes and effectiveness of the policy that 11    includes, but is not limited to, factors such as the 12    frequency of victimization; student, staff, and family 13    observations of safety at a school; identification of 14    areas of a school where bullying occurs; the types of 15    bullying utilized; and bystander intervention or 16    participation. The school district, charter school, or 17    non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school 18    may use relevant data and information it already collects 19    for other purposes in the policy evaluation. The 20    information developed as a result of the policy evaluation 21    must be made available on the Internet website of the 22    school district, charter school, or non-public, 23    non-sectarian elementary or secondary school. If an 24    Internet website is not available, the information must be 25    provided to school administrators, school board members, 26    school personnel, parents, guardians, and students.  HB1583- 59 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1        (12) Is consistent with the policies of the school 2    board, charter school, or non-public, non-sectarian 3    elementary or secondary school.4        (13) Requires all individual instances of bullying, as 5    well as all threats, suggestions, or instances of 6    self-harm determined to be the result of bullying, to be 7    reported to the parents or legal guardians of those 8    involved under the guidelines provided in paragraph (4) of 9    this definition. 10    "Restorative measures" means a continuum of school-based 11alternatives to exclusionary discipline, such as suspensions 12and expulsions, that: (i) are adapted to the particular needs 13of the school and community, (ii) contribute to maintaining 14school safety, (iii) protect the integrity of a positive and 15productive learning climate, (iv) teach students the personal 16and interpersonal skills they will need to be successful in 17school and society, (v) serve to build and restore 18relationships among students, families, schools, and 19communities, (vi) reduce the likelihood of future disruption 20by balancing accountability with an understanding of students' 21behavioral health needs in order to keep students in school, 22and (vii) increase student accountability if the incident of 23bullying is based on religion, race, ethnicity, or any other 24category that is identified in the Illinois Human Rights Act. 25    "School personnel" means persons employed by, on contract 26with, or who volunteer in a school district, charter school,   HB1583- 60 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school, 2including without limitation school and school district 3administrators, teachers, school social workers, school 4counselors, school psychologists, school nurses, cafeteria 5workers, custodians, bus drivers, school resource officers, 6school safety officers, and security guards. 7    (c) (Blank). 8    (d) Each school district, charter school, and non-public, 9non-sectarian elementary or secondary school shall create, 10maintain, and implement a policy on bullying, which policy 11must be filed with the State Board of Education. The policy on 12bullying shall be based on the State Board of Education's 13template for a model bullying prevention policy under 14subsection (h) and shall include the criteria set forth in the 15definition of "policy on bullying". The policy or implementing 16procedure shall include a process to investigate whether a 17reported act of bullying is within the permissible scope of 18the district's or school's jurisdiction and shall require that 19the district or school provide the victim with information 20regarding services that are available within the district and 21community, such as counseling, support services, and other 22programs. School personnel available for help with a bully or 23to make a report about bullying shall be made known to parents 24or legal guardians, students, and school personnel. Every 2 25years, each school district, charter school, and non-public, 26non-sectarian elementary or secondary school shall conduct a   HB1583- 61 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1review and re-evaluation of its policy and make any necessary 2and appropriate revisions. No later than September 30 of the 3subject year, the policy must be filed with the State Board of 4Education after being updated. The State Board of Education 5shall monitor and provide technical support for the 6implementation of policies created under this subsection (d). 7In monitoring the implementation of the policies, the State 8Board of Education shall review each filed policy on bullying 9to ensure all policies meet the requirements set forth in this 10Section, including ensuring that each policy meets the 12 11criterion identified within the definition of "policy on 12bullying" set forth in this Section. 13    If a school district, charter school, or non-public, 14non-sectarian elementary or secondary school fails to file a 15policy on bullying by September 30 of the subject year, the 16State Board of Education shall provide a written request for 17filing to the school district, charter school, or non-public, 18non-sectarian elementary or secondary school. If a school 19district, charter school, or non-public, non-sectarian 20elementary or secondary school fails to file a policy on 21bullying within 14 days of receipt of the aforementioned 22written request, the State Board of Education shall publish 23notice of the non-compliance on the State Board of Education's 24website. 25    Each school district, charter school, and non-public, 26non-sectarian elementary or secondary school may provide   HB1583- 62 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1evidence-based professional development and youth programming 2on bullying prevention that is consistent with the provisions 3of this Section. 4    (e) This Section shall not be interpreted to prevent a 5victim from seeking redress under any other available civil or 6criminal law. 7    (f) School districts, charter schools, and non-public, 8non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools shall collect, 9maintain, and submit to the State Board of Education 10non-identifiable data regarding verified allegations of 11bullying within the school district, charter school, or 12non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school. 13School districts, charter schools, and non-public, 14non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools must submit 15such data in an annual report due to the State Board of 16Education no later than August 15 of each year starting with 17the 2024-2025 school year through the 2030-2031 school year. 18The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the 19submission of data that includes, but is not limited to: (i) a 20record of each verified allegation of bullying and action 21taken; and (ii) whether the instance of bullying was based on 22actual or perceived characteristics identified in subsection 23(a) and, if so, lists the relevant characteristics. The rules 24for the submission of data shall be consistent with federal 25and State laws and rules governing student privacy rights, 26including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational   HB1583- 63 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 and the Illinois School Student 2Records Act, which shall include, without limitation, a record 3of each complaint and action taken. The State Board of 4Education shall adopt rules regarding the notification of 5school districts, charter schools, and non-public, 6non-sectarian elementary and secondary schools that fail to 7comply with the requirements of this subsection. 8    (g) Upon the request of a parent or legal guardian of a 9child enrolled in a school district, charter school, or 10non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary school 11within this State, the State Board of Education must provide 12non-identifiable data on the number of bullying allegations 13and incidents in a given year in the school district, charter 14school, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary 15school to the requesting parent or legal guardian. The State 16Board of Education shall adopt rules regarding (i) the 17handling of such data, (ii) maintaining the privacy of the 18students and families involved, and (iii) best practices for 19sharing numerical data with parents and legal guardians. 20    (h) By January 1, 2024, the State Board of Education shall 21post on its Internet website a template for a model bullying 22prevention policy.23    (i) The Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying Prevention 24Fund is created as a special fund in the State treasury. Any 25moneys appropriated to the Fund may be used, subject to 26appropriation, by the State Board of Education for the   HB1583- 64 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1purposes of subsection (j). 2    (j) Subject to appropriation, the State Superintendent of 3Education may provide a grant to a school district, charter 4school, or non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary 5school to support its anti-bullying programming. Grants may be 6awarded from the Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying 7Prevention Fund. School districts, charter schools, and 8non-public, non-sectarian elementary or secondary schools that 9are not in compliance with subsection (f) are not eligible to 10receive a grant from the Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying 11Prevention Fund. 12(Source: P.A. 102-197, eff. 7-30-21; 102-241, eff. 8-3-21; 13102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-894, eff. 5-20-22; 103-47, eff. 146-9-23.) 15    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.57)16    Sec. 34-18.57. Booking stations on school grounds.17    (a) There shall be no student booking station established 18or maintained on the grounds of any school.19    (b) This prohibition shall be applied to student booking 20stations only, as defined in this Section. The prohibition 21does not prohibit or affect the establishment or maintenance 22of any place operated by or under the control of law 23enforcement personnel, school resource officers, school safety 24officers, or other security personnel that does not also 25qualify as a student booking station as defined in paragraph   HB1583- 65 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1(2) of subsection (d) of this Section. The prohibition does 2not affect or limit the powers afforded law enforcement 3officers to perform their duties within schools as otherwise 4prescribed by law.5    (c) When the underlying suspected or alleged criminal act 6is an act of violence, and isolation of a student or students 7is deemed necessary to the interest of public safety, and no 8other location is adequate for secure isolation of the student 9or students, offices as described in paragraph (1) of 10subsection (d) of this Section may be employed to detain 11students for a period no longer than that required to 12alleviate that threat to public safety.13    (d) As used in this Section, "student booking station" 14means a building, office, room, or any indefinitely 15established space or site, mobile or fixed, which operates 16concurrently as:17        (1) predominantly or regularly a place of operation 18    for a municipal police department, county sheriff 19    department, or other law enforcement agency, or under the 20    primary control thereof; and21        (2) a site at which students are detained in 22    connection with criminal charges or allegations against 23    those students, taken into custody, or engaged with law 24    enforcement personnel in any process that creates a law 25    enforcement record of that contact with law enforcement 26    personnel or processes.  HB1583- 66 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1(Source: P.A. 100-204, eff. 8-18-17; 100-863, eff. 8-14-18.) 2    Section 20. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 3changing Sections 24-1 and 24-2 as follows: 4    (720 ILCS 5/24-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 24-1)5    Sec. 24-1. Unlawful possession of weapons. 6    (a) A person commits the offense of unlawful possession of 7weapons when he knowingly:8        (1) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 9    carries any bludgeon, black-jack, slung-shot, sand-club, 10    sand-bag, metal knuckles or other knuckle weapon 11    regardless of its composition, throwing star, or any 12    knife, commonly referred to as a switchblade knife, which 13    has a blade that opens automatically by hand pressure 14    applied to a button, spring or other device in the handle 15    of the knife, or a ballistic knife, which is a device that 16    propels a knifelike blade as a projectile by means of a 17    coil spring, elastic material or compressed gas; or18        (2) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 19    unlawfully against another, a dagger, dirk, billy, 20    dangerous knife, razor, stiletto, broken bottle or other 21    piece of glass, stun gun or taser or any other dangerous or 22    deadly weapon or instrument of like character; or23        (2.5) Carries or possesses with intent to use the same 24    unlawfully against another, any firearm in a church,   HB1583- 67 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    synagogue, mosque, or other building, structure, or place 2    used for religious worship; or 3        (3) Carries on or about his person or in any vehicle, a 4    tear gas gun projector or bomb or any object containing 5    noxious liquid gas or substance, other than an object 6    containing a non-lethal noxious liquid gas or substance 7    designed solely for personal defense carried by a person 8    18 years of age or older; or9        (4) Carries or possesses in any vehicle or concealed 10    on or about his person except when on his land or in his 11    own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place of business, or 12    on the land or in the legal dwelling of another person as 13    an invitee with that person's permission, any pistol, 14    revolver, stun gun or taser or other firearm, except that 15    this subsection (a)(4) does not apply to or affect 16    transportation of weapons that meet one of the following 17    conditions:18            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or19            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or20            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 21        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 22        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 23        Owner's Identification Card; or24            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 25        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 26        been issued a currently valid license under the   HB1583- 68 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1        Firearm Concealed Carry Act; or 2        (5) Sets a spring gun; or3        (6) Possesses any device or attachment of any kind 4    designed, used or intended for use in silencing the report 5    of any firearm; or6        (7) Sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses or 7    carries:8            (i) a machine gun, which shall be defined for the 9        purposes of this subsection as any weapon, which 10        shoots, is designed to shoot, or can be readily 11        restored to shoot, automatically more than one shot 12        without manually reloading by a single function of the 13        trigger, including the frame or receiver of any such 14        weapon, or sells, manufactures, purchases, possesses, 15        or carries any combination of parts designed or 16        intended for use in converting any weapon into a 17        machine gun, or any combination or parts from which a 18        machine gun can be assembled if such parts are in the 19        possession or under the control of a person;20            (ii) any rifle having one or more barrels less 21        than 16 inches in length or a shotgun having one or 22        more barrels less than 18 inches in length or any 23        weapon made from a rifle or shotgun, whether by 24        alteration, modification, or otherwise, if such a 25        weapon as modified has an overall length of less than 26        26 inches; or  HB1583- 69 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1            (iii) any bomb, bomb-shell, grenade, bottle or 2        other container containing an explosive substance of 3        over one-quarter ounce for like purposes, such as, but 4        not limited to, black powder bombs and Molotov 5        cocktails or artillery projectiles; or6        (8) Carries or possesses any firearm, stun gun or 7    taser or other deadly weapon in any place which is 8    licensed to sell intoxicating beverages, or at any public 9    gathering held pursuant to a license issued by any 10    governmental body or any public gathering at which an 11    admission is charged, excluding a place where a showing, 12    demonstration or lecture involving the exhibition of 13    unloaded firearms is conducted.14        This subsection (a)(8) does not apply to any auction 15    or raffle of a firearm held pursuant to a license or permit 16    issued by a governmental body, nor does it apply to 17    persons engaged in firearm safety training courses; or18        (9) Carries or possesses in a vehicle or on or about 19    his or her person any pistol, revolver, stun gun or taser 20    or firearm or ballistic knife, when he or she is hooded, 21    robed or masked in such manner as to conceal his or her 22    identity; or23        (10) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 24    person, upon any public street, alley, or other public 25    lands within the corporate limits of a city, village, or 26    incorporated town, except when an invitee thereon or   HB1583- 70 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    therein, for the purpose of the display of such weapon or 2    the lawful commerce in weapons, or except when on his land 3    or in his or her own abode, legal dwelling, or fixed place 4    of business, or on the land or in the legal dwelling of 5    another person as an invitee with that person's 6    permission, any pistol, revolver, stun gun, or taser or 7    other firearm, except that this subsection (a)(10) does 8    not apply to or affect transportation of weapons that meet 9    one of the following conditions:10            (i) are broken down in a non-functioning state; or11            (ii) are not immediately accessible; or12            (iii) are unloaded and enclosed in a case, firearm 13        carrying box, shipping box, or other container by a 14        person who has been issued a currently valid Firearm 15        Owner's Identification Card; or16            (iv) are carried or possessed in accordance with 17        the Firearm Concealed Carry Act by a person who has 18        been issued a currently valid license under the 19        Firearm Concealed Carry Act. 20        A "stun gun or taser", as used in this paragraph (a) 21    means (i) any device which is powered by electrical 22    charging units, such as, batteries, and which fires one or 23    several barbs attached to a length of wire and which, upon 24    hitting a human, can send out a current capable of 25    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 26    to render him incapable of normal functioning or (ii) any   HB1583- 71 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    device which is powered by electrical charging units, such 2    as batteries, and which, upon contact with a human or 3    clothing worn by a human, can send out current capable of 4    disrupting the person's nervous system in such a manner as 5    to render him incapable of normal functioning; or6        (11) Sells, manufactures, delivers, imports, 7    possesses, or purchases any assault weapon attachment or 8    .50 caliber cartridge in violation of Section 24-1.9 or 9    any explosive bullet. For purposes of this paragraph (a) 10    "explosive bullet" means the projectile portion of an 11    ammunition cartridge which contains or carries an 12    explosive charge which will explode upon contact with the 13    flesh of a human or an animal. "Cartridge" means a tubular 14    metal case having a projectile affixed at the front 15    thereof and a cap or primer at the rear end thereof, with 16    the propellant contained in such tube between the 17    projectile and the cap; or18        (12) (Blank); or19        (13) Carries or possesses on or about his or her 20    person while in a building occupied by a unit of 21    government, a billy club, other weapon of like character, 22    or other instrument of like character intended for use as 23    a weapon. For the purposes of this Section, "billy club" 24    means a short stick or club commonly carried by police 25    officers which is either telescopic or constructed of a 26    solid piece of wood or other man-made material; or  HB1583- 72 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1        (14) Manufactures, possesses, sells, or offers to 2    sell, purchase, manufacture, import, transfer, or use any 3    device, part, kit, tool, accessory, or combination of 4    parts that is designed to and functions to increase the 5    rate of fire of a semiautomatic firearm above the standard 6    rate of fire for semiautomatic firearms that is not 7    equipped with that device, part, or combination of parts; 8    or9        (15) Carries or possesses any assault weapon or .50 10    caliber rifle in violation of Section 24-1.9; or11        (16) Manufactures, sells, delivers, imports, or 12    purchases any assault weapon or .50 caliber rifle in 13    violation of Section 24-1.9. 14    (b) Sentence. A person convicted of a violation of 15subsection 24-1(a)(1) through (5), subsection 24-1(a)(10), 16subsection 24-1(a)(11), subsection 24-1(a)(13), or 24-1(a)(15) 17commits a Class A misdemeanor. A person convicted of a 18violation of subsection 24-1(a)(8) or 24-1(a)(9) commits a 19Class 4 felony; a person convicted of a violation of 20subsection 24-1(a)(6), 24-1(a)(7)(ii), 24-1(a)(7)(iii), or 2124-1(a)(16) commits a Class 3 felony. A person convicted of a 22violation of subsection 24-1(a)(7)(i) commits a Class 2 felony 23and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not less 24than 3 years and not more than 7 years, unless the weapon is 25possessed in the passenger compartment of a motor vehicle as 26defined in Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, or on   HB1583- 73 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1the person, while the weapon is loaded, in which case it shall 2be a Class X felony. A person convicted of a second or 3subsequent violation of subsection 24-1(a)(4), 24-1(a)(8), 424-1(a)(9), 24-1(a)(10), or 24-1(a)(15) commits a Class 3 5felony. A person convicted of a violation of subsection 624-1(a)(2.5) or 24-1(a)(14) commits a Class 2 felony. The 7possession of each weapon or device in violation of this 8Section constitutes a single and separate violation.9    (c) Violations in specific places.10        (1) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(6) or 11    24-1(a)(7) in any school, regardless of the time of day or 12    the time of year, in residential property owned, operated 13    or managed by a public housing agency or leased by a public 14    housing agency as part of a scattered site or mixed-income 15    development, in a public park, in a courthouse, on the 16    real property comprising any school, regardless of the 17    time of day or the time of year, on residential property 18    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 19    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 20    site or mixed-income development, on the real property 21    comprising any public park, on the real property 22    comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance owned, leased 23    or contracted by a school to transport students to or from 24    school or a school related activity, in any conveyance 25    owned, leased, or contracted by a public transportation 26    agency, or on any public way within 1,000 feet of the real   HB1583- 74 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    property comprising any school, public park, courthouse, 2    public transportation facility, or residential property 3    owned, operated, or managed by a public housing agency or 4    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 5    site or mixed-income development commits a Class 2 felony 6    and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not 7    less than 3 years and not more than 7 years.8        (1.5) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(4), 9    24-1(a)(9), or 24-1(a)(10) in any school, regardless of 10    the time of day or the time of year, in residential 11    property owned, operated, or managed by a public housing 12    agency or leased by a public housing agency as part of a 13    scattered site or mixed-income development, in a public 14    park, in a courthouse, on the real property comprising any 15    school, regardless of the time of day or the time of year, 16    on residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 17    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 18    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 19    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 20    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 21    owned, leased, or contracted by a school to transport 22    students to or from school or a school related activity, 23    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 24    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 25    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 26    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or   HB1583- 75 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 2    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 3    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development 4    commits a Class 3 felony.5        (2) A person who violates subsection 24-1(a)(1), 6    24-1(a)(2), or 24-1(a)(3) in any school, regardless of the 7    time of day or the time of year, in residential property 8    owned, operated or managed by a public housing agency or 9    leased by a public housing agency as part of a scattered 10    site or mixed-income development, in a public park, in a 11    courthouse, on the real property comprising any school, 12    regardless of the time of day or the time of year, on 13    residential property owned, operated or managed by a 14    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 15    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development, 16    on the real property comprising any public park, on the 17    real property comprising any courthouse, in any conveyance 18    owned, leased or contracted by a school to transport 19    students to or from school or a school related activity, 20    in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a public 21    transportation agency, or on any public way within 1,000 22    feet of the real property comprising any school, public 23    park, courthouse, public transportation facility, or 24    residential property owned, operated, or managed by a 25    public housing agency or leased by a public housing agency 26    as part of a scattered site or mixed-income development   HB1583- 76 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    commits a Class 4 felony. "Courthouse" means any building 2    that is used by the Circuit, Appellate, or Supreme Court 3    of this State for the conduct of official business.4        (3) Paragraphs (1), (1.5), and (2) of this subsection 5    (c) shall not apply to law enforcement officers or 6    security officers of such school, college, or university 7    or to students carrying or possessing firearms for use in 8    training courses, parades, hunting, target shooting on 9    school ranges, or otherwise with the consent of school 10    authorities and which firearms are transported unloaded 11    enclosed in a suitable case, box, or transportation 12    package.13        (3.1) Paragraph (1.5) of this subsection (c) does not 14    apply to or affect a qualified current or retired law 15    enforcement officer qualified under the laws of this State 16    or under the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act 17    carrying or possessing firearms in or on the properties 18    listed in paragraph (1.5) of this subsection (c). 19        (4) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "school" 20    means any public or private elementary or secondary 21    school, community college, college, or university.22        (5) For the purposes of this subsection (c), "public 23    transportation agency" means a public or private agency 24    that provides for the transportation or conveyance of 25    persons by means available to the general public, except 26    for transportation by automobiles not used for conveyance   HB1583- 77 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    of the general public as passengers; and "public 2    transportation facility" means a terminal or other place 3    where one may obtain public transportation. 4    (d) The presence in an automobile other than a public 5omnibus of any weapon, instrument or substance referred to in 6subsection (a)(7) is prima facie evidence that it is in the 7possession of, and is being carried by, all persons occupying 8such automobile at the time such weapon, instrument or 9substance is found, except under the following circumstances: 10(i) if such weapon, instrument or instrumentality is found 11upon the person of one of the occupants therein; or (ii) if 12such weapon, instrument or substance is found in an automobile 13operated for hire by a duly licensed driver in the due, lawful 14and proper pursuit of his or her trade, then such presumption 15shall not apply to the driver.16    (e) Exemptions.17        (1) Crossbows, Common or Compound bows and Underwater 18    Spearguns are exempted from the definition of ballistic 19    knife as defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of 20    this Section.21        (2) The provision of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) 22    of this Section prohibiting the sale, manufacture, 23    purchase, possession, or carrying of any knife, commonly 24    referred to as a switchblade knife, which has a blade that 25    opens automatically by hand pressure applied to a button, 26    spring or other device in the handle of the knife, does not   HB1583- 78 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    apply to a person who possesses a currently valid Firearm 2    Owner's Identification Card previously issued in his or 3    her name by the Illinois State Police or to a person or an 4    entity engaged in the business of selling or manufacturing 5    switchblade knives. 6(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1116, eff. 1-10-23; 7103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 8    (720 ILCS 5/24-2)9    Sec. 24-2. Exemptions. 10    (a) Subsections 24-1(a)(3), 24-1(a)(4), 24-1(a)(10), and 1124-1(a)(13) and Section 24-1.6 do not apply to or affect any of 12the following:13        (1) Peace officers, and any person summoned by a peace 14    officer to assist in making arrests or preserving the 15    peace, while actually engaged in assisting such officer.16        (2) Wardens, superintendents, and keepers of prisons, 17    penitentiaries, jails, and other institutions for the 18    detention of persons accused or convicted of an offense, 19    while in the performance of their official duty, or while 20    commuting between their homes and places of employment.21        (3) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 22    the United States or the Illinois National Guard or the 23    Reserve Officers Training Corps, while in the performance 24    of their official duty.25        (4) Special agents employed by a railroad or a public   HB1583- 79 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    utility to perform police functions, and guards of armored 2    car companies, while actually engaged in the performance 3    of the duties of their employment or commuting between 4    their homes and places of employment; and watchmen while 5    actually engaged in the performance of the duties of their 6    employment.7        (5) Persons licensed as private security contractors, 8    private detectives, or private alarm contractors, or 9    employed by a private security contractor, private 10    detective, or private alarm contractor agency licensed by 11    the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, 12    if their duties include the carrying of a weapon under the 13    provisions of the Private Detective, Private Alarm, 14    Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 15    2004, while actually engaged in the performance of the 16    duties of their employment or commuting between their 17    homes and places of employment. A person shall be 18    considered eligible for this exemption if he or she has 19    completed the required 20 hours of training for a private 20    security contractor, private detective, or private alarm 21    contractor, or employee of a licensed private security 22    contractor, private detective, or private alarm contractor 23    agency and 28 hours of required firearm training, and has 24    been issued a firearm control card by the Department of 25    Financial and Professional Regulation. Conditions for the 26    renewal of firearm control cards issued under the   HB1583- 80 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    provisions of this Section shall be the same as for those 2    cards issued under the provisions of the Private 3    Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint 4    Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004. The firearm control 5    card shall be carried by the private security contractor, 6    private detective, or private alarm contractor, or 7    employee of the licensed private security contractor, 8    private detective, or private alarm contractor agency at 9    all times when he or she is in possession of a concealable 10    weapon permitted by his or her firearm control card.11        (6) Any person regularly employed in a commercial or 12    industrial operation as a security guard for the 13    protection of persons employed and private property 14    related to such commercial or industrial operation, while 15    actually engaged in the performance of his or her duty or 16    traveling between sites or properties belonging to the 17    employer, and who, as a security guard, is a member of a 18    security force registered with the Department of Financial 19    and Professional Regulation; provided that such security 20    guard has successfully completed a course of study, 21    approved by and supervised by the Department of Financial 22    and Professional Regulation, consisting of not less than 23    48 hours of training that includes the theory of law 24    enforcement, liability for acts, and the handling of 25    weapons. A person shall be considered eligible for this 26    exemption if he or she has completed the required 20 hours   HB1583- 81 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    of training for a security officer and 28 hours of 2    required firearm training, and has been issued a firearm 3    control card by the Department of Financial and 4    Professional Regulation. Conditions for the renewal of 5    firearm control cards issued under the provisions of this 6    Section shall be the same as for those cards issued under 7    the provisions of the Private Detective, Private Alarm, 8    Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 9    2004. The firearm control card shall be carried by the 10    security guard at all times when he or she is in possession 11    of a concealable weapon permitted by his or her firearm 12    control card.13        (7) Agents and investigators of the Illinois 14    Legislative Investigating Commission authorized by the 15    Commission to carry the weapons specified in subsections 16    24-1(a)(3) and 24-1(a)(4), while on duty in the course of 17    any investigation for the Commission.18        (8) Persons employed by a financial institution as a 19    security guard for the protection of other employees and 20    property related to such financial institution, while 21    actually engaged in the performance of their duties, 22    commuting between their homes and places of employment, or 23    traveling between sites or properties owned or operated by 24    such financial institution, and who, as a security guard, 25    is a member of a security force registered with the 26    Department; provided that any person so employed has   HB1583- 82 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    successfully completed a course of study, approved by and 2    supervised by the Department of Financial and Professional 3    Regulation, consisting of not less than 48 hours of 4    training which includes theory of law enforcement, 5    liability for acts, and the handling of weapons. A person 6    shall be considered to be eligible for this exemption if 7    he or she has completed the required 20 hours of training 8    for a security officer and 28 hours of required firearm 9    training, and has been issued a firearm control card by 10    the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation. 11    Conditions for renewal of firearm control cards issued 12    under the provisions of this Section shall be the same as 13    for those issued under the provisions of the Private 14    Detective, Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint 15    Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 2004. The firearm control 16    card shall be carried by the security guard at all times 17    when he or she is in possession of a concealable weapon 18    permitted by his or her firearm control card. For purposes 19    of this subsection, "financial institution" means a bank, 20    savings and loan association, credit union, or company 21    providing armored car services.22        (9) Any person employed by an armored car company to 23    drive an armored car, while actually engaged in the 24    performance of his duties.25        (10) Persons who have been classified as peace 26    officers pursuant to the Peace Officer Fire Investigation   HB1583- 83 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    Act.2        (11) Investigators of the Office of the State's 3    Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor authorized by the board of 4    governors of the Office of the State's Attorneys Appellate 5    Prosecutor to carry weapons pursuant to Section 7.06 of 6    the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor's Act.7        (12) Special investigators appointed by a State's 8    Attorney under Section 3-9005 of the Counties Code.9        (12.5) Probation officers while in the performance of 10    their duties, or while commuting between their homes, 11    places of employment or specific locations that are part 12    of their assigned duties, with the consent of the chief 13    judge of the circuit for which they are employed, if they 14    have received weapons training according to requirements 15    of the Peace Officer and Probation Officer Firearm 16    Training Act.17        (13) Court security officers Security Officers while 18    in the performance of their official duties, or while 19    commuting between their homes and places of employment, 20    with the consent of the sheriff Sheriff.21        (13.5) A person employed as an armed security guard at 22    a nuclear energy, storage, weapons, or development site or 23    facility regulated by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission 24    who has completed the background screening and training 25    mandated by the rules and regulations of the Nuclear 26    Regulatory Commission.  HB1583- 84 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1        (14) Manufacture, transportation, or sale of weapons 2    to persons authorized under subdivisions (1) through 3    (13.5) of this subsection to possess those weapons.4    (a-5) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) do not apply 5to or affect any person carrying a concealed pistol, revolver, 6or handgun and the person has been issued a currently valid 7license under the Firearm Concealed Carry Act at the time of 8the commission of the offense.9    (a-6) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) do not apply 10to or affect a qualified current or retired law enforcement 11officer or a current or retired deputy, county correctional 12officer, or correctional officer of the Department of 13Corrections qualified under the laws of this State or under 14the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act. 15    (a-7) Paragraph (1.5) of subsection (c) of Section 24-1 16does not apply to or affect a qualified current or retired law 17enforcement officer qualified under the laws of this State or 18under the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act carrying 19or possessing firearms in or on the properties listed in 20paragraph (1.5) of subsection (c) of Section 24-1. 21    (b) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) and Section 2224-1.6 do not apply to or affect any of the following:23        (1) Members of any club or organization organized for 24    the purpose of practicing shooting at targets upon 25    established target ranges, whether public or private, and 26    patrons of such ranges, while such members or patrons are   HB1583- 85 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    using their firearms on those target ranges.2        (2) Duly authorized military or civil organizations 3    while parading, with the special permission of the 4    Governor.5        (3) Hunters, trappers, or fishermen while engaged in 6    lawful hunting, trapping, or fishing under the provisions 7    of the Wildlife Code or the Fish and Aquatic Life Code.8        (4) Transportation of weapons that are broken down in 9    a non-functioning state or are not immediately accessible.10        (5) Carrying or possessing any pistol, revolver, stun 11    gun or taser or other firearm on the land or in the legal 12    dwelling of another person as an invitee with that 13    person's permission. 14    (c) Subsection 24-1(a)(7) does not apply to or affect any 15of the following:16        (1) Peace officers while in performance of their 17    official duties.18        (2) Wardens, superintendents, and keepers of prisons, 19    penitentiaries, jails, and other institutions for the 20    detention of persons accused or convicted of an offense.21        (3) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 22    the United States or the Illinois National Guard, while in 23    the performance of their official duty.24        (4) Manufacture, transportation, or sale of machine 25    guns to persons authorized under subdivisions (1) through 26    (3) of this subsection to possess machine guns, if the   HB1583- 86 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    machine guns are broken down in a non-functioning state or 2    are not immediately accessible.3        (5) Persons licensed under federal law to manufacture 4    any weapon from which 8 or more shots or bullets can be 5    discharged by a single function of the firing device, or 6    ammunition for such weapons, and actually engaged in the 7    business of manufacturing such weapons or ammunition, but 8    only with respect to activities which are within the 9    lawful scope of such business, such as the manufacture, 10    transportation, or testing of such weapons or ammunition. 11    This exemption does not authorize the general private 12    possession of any weapon from which 8 or more shots or 13    bullets can be discharged by a single function of the 14    firing device, but only such possession and activities as 15    are within the lawful scope of a licensed manufacturing 16    business described in this paragraph.17        During transportation, such weapons shall be broken 18    down in a non-functioning state or not immediately 19    accessible.20        (6) The manufacture, transport, testing, delivery, 21    transfer, or sale, and all lawful commercial or 22    experimental activities necessary thereto, of rifles, 23    shotguns, and weapons made from rifles or shotguns, or 24    ammunition for such rifles, shotguns, or weapons, where 25    engaged in by a person operating as a contractor or 26    subcontractor pursuant to a contract or subcontract for   HB1583- 87 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    the development and supply of such rifles, shotguns, 2    weapons, or ammunition to the United States government or 3    any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, when 4    such activities are necessary and incident to fulfilling 5    the terms of such contract.6        The exemption granted under this subdivision (c)(6) 7    shall also apply to any authorized agent of any such 8    contractor or subcontractor who is operating within the 9    scope of his employment, where such activities involving 10    such weapon, weapons, or ammunition are necessary and 11    incident to fulfilling the terms of such contract.12        (7) A person possessing a rifle with a barrel or 13    barrels less than 16 inches in length if: (A) the person 14    has been issued a Curios and Relics license from the U.S. 15    Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives; or 16    (B) the person is an active member of a bona fide, 17    nationally recognized military re-enacting group and the 18    modification is required and necessary to accurately 19    portray the weapon for historical re-enactment purposes; 20    the re-enactor is in possession of a valid and current 21    re-enacting group membership credential; and the overall 22    length of the weapon as modified is not less than 26 23    inches.24    (d) Subsection 24-1(a)(1) does not apply to the purchase, 25possession or carrying of a black-jack or slung-shot by a 26peace officer.  HB1583- 88 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    (e) Subsection 24-1(a)(8) does not apply to any owner, 2manager, or authorized employee of any place specified in that 3subsection nor to any law enforcement officer.4    (f) Subsection 24-1(a)(4) and subsection 24-1(a)(10) and 5Section 24-1.6 do not apply to members of any club or 6organization organized for the purpose of practicing shooting 7at targets upon established target ranges, whether public or 8private, while using their firearms on those target ranges.9    (g) Subsections 24-1(a)(11) and 24-3.1(a)(6) do not apply 10to:11        (1) Members of the Armed Services or Reserve Forces of 12    the United States or the Illinois National Guard, while in 13    the performance of their official duty.14        (2) Bonafide collectors of antique or surplus military 15    ordnance.16        (3) Laboratories having a department of forensic 17    ballistics, or specializing in the development of 18    ammunition or explosive ordnance.19        (4) Commerce, preparation, assembly, or possession of 20    explosive bullets by manufacturers of ammunition licensed 21    by the federal government, in connection with the supply 22    of those organizations and persons exempted by subdivision 23    (g)(1) of this Section, or like organizations and persons 24    outside this State, or the transportation of explosive 25    bullets to any organization or person exempted in this 26    Section by a common carrier or by a vehicle owned or leased   HB1583- 89 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1    by an exempted manufacturer.2    (g-5) Subsection 24-1(a)(6) does not apply to or affect 3persons licensed under federal law to manufacture any device 4or attachment of any kind designed, used, or intended for use 5in silencing the report of any firearm, firearms, or 6ammunition for those firearms equipped with those devices, and 7actually engaged in the business of manufacturing those 8devices, firearms, or ammunition, but only with respect to 9activities that are within the lawful scope of that business, 10such as the manufacture, transportation, or testing of those 11devices, firearms, or ammunition. This exemption does not 12authorize the general private possession of any device or 13attachment of any kind designed, used, or intended for use in 14silencing the report of any firearm, but only such possession 15and activities as are within the lawful scope of a licensed 16manufacturing business described in this subsection (g-5). 17During transportation, these devices shall be detached from 18any weapon or not immediately accessible.19    (g-6) Subsections 24-1(a)(4) and 24-1(a)(10) and Section 2024-1.6 do not apply to or affect any parole agent or parole 21supervisor who meets the qualifications and conditions 22prescribed in Section 3-14-1.5 of the Unified Code of 23Corrections. 24    (g-7) Subsection 24-1(a)(6) does not apply to a peace 25officer while serving as a member of a tactical response team 26or special operations team. A peace officer may not personally   HB1583- 90 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1own or apply for ownership of a device or attachment of any 2kind designed, used, or intended for use in silencing the 3report of any firearm. These devices shall be owned and 4maintained by lawfully recognized units of government whose 5duties include the investigation of criminal acts.6    (g-10) (Blank). 7    (h) An information or indictment based upon a violation of 8any subsection of this Article need not negate negative any 9exemptions contained in this Article. The defendant shall have 10the burden of proving such an exemption.11    (i) Nothing in this Article shall prohibit, apply to, or 12affect the transportation, carrying, or possession, of any 13pistol or revolver, stun gun, taser, or other firearm 14consigned to a common carrier operating under license of the 15State of Illinois or the federal government, where such 16transportation, carrying, or possession is incident to the 17lawful transportation in which such common carrier is engaged; 18and nothing in this Article shall prohibit, apply to, or 19affect the transportation, carrying, or possession of any 20pistol, revolver, stun gun, taser, or other firearm, not the 21subject of and regulated by subsection 24-1(a)(7) or 22subsection 24-2(c) of this Article, which is unloaded and 23enclosed in a case, firearm carrying box, shipping box, or 24other container, by the possessor of a valid Firearm Owners 25Identification Card.26(Source: P.A. 102-152, eff. 1-1-22; 102-779, eff. 1-1-23;   HB1583- 91 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1102-837, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; revised 27-22-24.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.  HB1583- 92 -LRB104 08760 RTM 18814 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    50 ILCS 705/10.24    50 ILCS 705/10.27 new5    50 ILCS 706/10-156    105 ILCS 5/10-20.647    105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new8    105 ILCS 5/10-22.6from Ch. 122, par. 10-22.69    105 ILCS 5/17-2.11from Ch. 122, par. 17-2.1110    105 ILCS 5/22-8511    105 ILCS 5/22-8812    105 ILCS 5/26A-2013    105 ILCS 5/27-23.714    105 ILCS 5/34-18.5715    720 ILCS 5/24-1from Ch. 38, par. 24-116    720 ILCS 5/24-2